Utah statutes.
52-7-201.   Reimbursement of attorney fees and court costs in Article V lawsuits.

If any public officer is named as a defendant in a civil suit that alleges a violation of Article V of the Utah Constitution, and that lawsuit is dismissed or results in a judgment in favor of the defendant, the public officer may, by complying with the requirements and procedures of this chapter, submit a claim to the state for reimbursement of the defendant’s reasonable attorney fees and court costs necessarily incurred in the defense of that civil suit.

